Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-404
Permits; qualifications;
limitations.

(1) Any resident of the United States
who has resided in this state continuously for a period of thirty days before
applying for a permit under the Game Law and who has a bona fide intention
of becoming a legal resident of this state, supported by documentary proof,
shall be deemed to be a resident and may be issued a resident permit under
the Game Law.

(2) No hunting permit shall be issued to any person who is
known to have a significant physical or mental disability and who is unable
to safely carry or use a firearm because of such disability except as provided in section 37-404.01.

(3) The commission may limit the number of days for which
a permit is issued and the number of fish or game birds taken on one permit.
The commission may provide for a method of tagging and identification of fish
and game birds taken under a nonresident permit.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 114;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 17;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB699, § 3.

Legislature was constitutionally free to determine by what authority licenses should be imposed upon those desiring to hunt and fish. State ex rel. Stevens v. Nickerson, 97 Neb. 837, 151 N.W. 981 (1915).